Tennessee, session 114, SB1624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Transparency for Deepfakes in
Political Advertising Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-19-120(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(6)
(A) Such communication, when in audio form, if considered a deepfake
as defined in § 39-17-1902 and impersonating a candidate for elected office
engaging in speech in which the candidate did not in fact engage, shall clearly
state at the beginning and at the end of the communication:
This communication contains fake content impersonating speech
that did not occur.
(B) Such communication, when in video form, if considered a deepfake
as defined in § 39-17-1902 and depicting a candidate for elected office engaging
in action or speech in which the depicted candidate did not in fact engage, shall
clearly state in large letters for the duration of the video:
(i) If the communication includes only video media:
This communication contains fake content depicting
actions that did not occur.
SB1624
010690
- 1 -

(ii) If the communication includes both audio and video media of a
candidate engaging in action or speech in which the candidate did not
engage:
This communication contains fake content depicting
actions and speech that did not occur.
(C) When the impersonated or depicted candidate is not an incumbent
office holder, subdivisions (a)(6)(A) and (a)(6)(B) apply only if the communication
is distributed within one hundred twenty (120) days of the initiation of voting in an
election in which the candidate for elected office appears on the ballot.
(D) A person or entity who is a broadcaster, host, third-party producer, or
carrier of such communication is not liable under this subdivision (a)(6) unless
the person or entity is responsible for the communication.
(E) An impersonated or depicted candidate for elected office who is the
subject of a deepfake communication as described in this subdivision (a)(6) is
entitled to damages and equitable relief as provided for in § 39-17-1904, with the
exception of § 39-17-1904(c).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010690